Alaska, session 34, HB251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 01.10.060(a)(8) is amended to read: 05 (8) "person" includes a corporation, company, partnership, firm, 06 association, organization, business trust, or society, as well as a natural person; or a 07 human entity that has the moral right of self-determination; "person" does not 08 include an environmental element, artificial intelligence, animal, or inanimate 09 object; 10 * Sec. 2. AS 11.81.900(b)(48) is amended to read: 11 (48) "person" means a natural person or a human entity that has the 12 moral right of self-determination and, when appropriate, an organization, 13 government, or governmental instrumentality; "person" does not include an 14 environmental element, artificial intelligence, animal, or inanimate object; 01 * Sec. 3. AS 11.81.900(b) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 02 (71) "life" means the property or quality that distinguishes a living 03 human organism from a dead organism or inanimate matter and that is manifested in 04 the function of metabolism, growth, or reproduction, a response to stimuli, or 05 adaptation to the environment, each of which originates within the organism. 06 * Sec. 4. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 07 read: 08 APPLICABILITY. AS 11.81.900(b)(48), as amended by sec. 2 of this Act, and AS 09 11.81.900(b)(71), enacted by sec. 3 of this Act, apply to offenses committed on or after the 10 effective date of this Act. 11 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.